Illinois, session 104th, HB1213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.25 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)7    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 8except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire 9rifle, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as provided by 10administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during the open 11season of not more than 14 days which will be set annually by 12the Director between the dates of November 1 1st and December 1331 31st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only season 14between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 15purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 16limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 17or revolver and centerfire rifles that are single shot. The 18only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 19bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 20a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 21straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger, 22both of which must be available as a factory load with the 23published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a   HB1213- 2 -LRB104 04990 BDA 15018 b1capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 2The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 3jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.4    The Department shall adopt make administrative rules 5concerning management restrictions applicable to the firearm 6and bow and arrow season.7    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 8with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire rifle, or 9muzzleloading rifle during the firearm open season set 10annually by the Director between the dates of November 1 and 11December 31, both inclusive, or as otherwise provided in this 12Section. The firearm open season for the taking of deer set 13annually by the Director between the dates of November 1 and 14December 31, both inclusive, shall include (1) a period before 15Thanksgiving of at least 4 consecutive days, (2) a period 16after Thanksgiving of at least 5 consecutive days, and (3) a 17total period of not more than 14 days. 18    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 19with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 20set annually by the Director between the dates of September 211st and January 31st, both inclusive.22    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 23with (i) a muzzleloading rifle or (ii) bow and arrow during the 24open season for muzzleloading rifles set annually by the 25Director.26    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting   HB1213- 3 -LRB104 04990 BDA 15018 b1forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 2possession limits and those counties of the State where open 3seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 4Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.5    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 6the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 7found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 8or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 9announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 10shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.11    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 12harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 13purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 14the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 15season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 16and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 17February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 18announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 19shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 20The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 21regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to 22management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 23program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 24that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 25to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 26held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were   HB1213- 4 -LRB104 04990 BDA 15018 b1issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 2the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 3program. 4    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 5the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 6providing information regarding deer management programs 7established by the Code or by administrative rule that 8includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 9separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 10communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 11happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 12(Source: P.A. 101-66, eff. 7-12-19; 102-314, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-932, eff. 1-1-23.)